Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.365

Tariff for irrigation pumping service—Authority to buy back electricity.

The council or board may approve a tariff for irrigation pumping service that allows the municipal utility to buy back electricity from customers to reduce electricity usage by those customers during the municipal utility's particular irrigation season.

[ 2001 c 122 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 122: See note following RCW 80.28.310.